Massachusetts, session 194th, H3646.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 6C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following section:- 
Section 80. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, beginning June 1 
of any year, the department shall expend on a quarterly basis money to each city and town for 
projects: (i) approved under chapter 90 or any capital appropriation pursuant thereto; and (ii) 
related to the construction, maintenance or repair of roads and bridges. Such quarterly 
expenditure shall not exceed one-fourth of the total expenditure allotted to that city or town for 
the fiscal year pursuant to this section. 
SECTION 2. The Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall promulgate or 
amend any regulations necessary to implement this act.